District of Columbia statutes.
38-771.06

Rulemaking.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement this chapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 14-day period of review. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within the 14-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Oct. 17, 2013, D.C. Law 20-27, § 106, 60 DCR 11120
Jan. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-44, § 2(d), 62 DCR 14236
This section is referenced in § 38-771.05 and § 38-771.07.
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-44 substituted “14-day” for “45-day” twice in (b).